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DTC P0 115/22EngineCoolantTemperatureCircuit

DTC P0 117/22EngineCoolantTemperatureCircuitLow
Input

DTC P0 118/22EngineCoolantTemperatureCircuitHigh
Input

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
A thermistor is built in the Engine Coolant Temperature (ECT) sensor and changes the resistance value ac-
cording to the engine coolant temperature.
The structure of the sensor and connection to the engine control ECU is the same the Intake Air Temperature
(IAT) sensor.
HINT:
If theenginecontrolECUdetects theDTC”P0 115/22,P0 117/22orP0 118/22”, it operates the fail −safe func-
tion inwhich theECT isassumed tobe80 �C (176 �F).

DTCNo. Proceed to DTCDetectionCondition Trouble Area

P0115/22 Step 1

Open or short in engine cool-
ant temperature sensor circuit
for 0.5 sec. (ECT equal to
−40˚ C (−40˚ F)ormore than
140˚ C(284 ˚ F))
(1 tripdetection logic)

P0117/22 Step4

Short in engine coolant tem-
perature sensor circuit for 0.5
sec. (ECT ismore than
140˚ C(284 ˚ F))
(1 tripdetection logic)

SOpenorshort inenginecoolant temperaturesensorcircuit
SEnginecoolant temperaturesensor
SEnginecontrolECU

P0118/22 Step2

Open in engine coolant tem-
perature sensor circuit for 0.5
sec. (ECT is −40˚ C (−40˚ F))
(1 tripdetection logic)

HINT:
AfterconfirmingDTC”P0 115,P0 117 o r P 0118,”use thehand −held tester toconfirm theenginecoolant tem-
perature from the DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL.

Temperature Displayed Malfunction

−40˚ C (−40˚ F) Open circuit

140˚ C(284 ˚F)ormore Short circuit
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MONITOR DESCRIPTION
The ECT (Engine Coolant Temperature) sensor is used to monitor the engine coolant temperature. The ECT
sensor has a thermistor that varies its resistance depending on the temperature of the engine coolant. When
the coolant temperature is low, the resistance in the thermistor increases. When the temperature is high, the
resistance drops. The variations in resistance are reflected in the voltage output from the sensor.
The engine control ECU monitors the sensor voltage and uses this value to calculate the engine coolant
temperature. When the sensor output voltage deviates from the normal operating range, the engine control
ECU interprets this as a fault in the ECT sensor and sets a DTC.
Example:
When theenginecontrolECUcalculates that theECT is less than −40�C (−40�F),ormore than 140�C
(284�F),and ifeither theconditioncontinues for0.5sec.ormore, theenginecontrolECUwill setaDTC.
This monitor runs 0.5 seconds after the ignition switch turned ON.

WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S Read freeze framedatausing the hand−held tester.Freeze framedata records theengineconditions

when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehiclewas runningorstopped, if theenginewaswarmedupornot, if theair −fuel ratiowas leanor
rich, and other data from the time the malfunction occurred.
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1 Connect hand−held tester, and read value of engine coolant temperature.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand−held tester main switch ON.
(c) When using hand−held tester, enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST /

ALL / COOLANT TEMP.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Same value as actual engine coolant temperature.
RESULT:

Temperature Displayed Proceed to

−40˚  C (−40˚  F) A

140˚  C (284˚  F) or more B

OK (Same as present temperature) C

HINT:
S If there is an open circuit, hand−held tester indicates −40˚ C (−40˚ F).
S If there is a short circuit, hand−held tester indicates 140˚ C (284˚ F) or more.

B Go to step 4.

C Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI−3) .

A
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2 Check for open in harness or engine control ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the E2 engine coolant temperature (ECT)

sensor connector.
(b)Connect terminals 1 and2of theenginecoolant tempera-

ture sensor wire harness side connector.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(d)Whenusinghand −held tester,enter the followingmenus:

DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / COOL-
ANTTEMP.

CHECK:
Read the temperaturevalueon thehand −held tester.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: 140�C(284 �F)ormore

OK Confirm good connection at sensor. If OK, re-
place engine coolant temperature sensor.

NG
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3 Check for open in harness or engine control ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the E2 engine coolant temperature sensor

connector.
(b) Connect terminals THW and E2 of the E7 engine control

ECU connector.
HINT:
Before checking, do a visual and contact pressure checks for
the engine control ECU connector.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(d) When using hand−held tester, enter the following menus:

DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / COOL-
ANT TEMP.

CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: 140�C (284�F) or more

OK Repair or replace harness or connector.

NG

Confirm good connection at engine control
ECU. If OK, check and replace engine control
ECU (See page IN−20).

4 Check for short in harness and engine control ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the E2 engine coolant temperature sensor

connector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(c) When using hand−held tester, enter the following menus:

DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / COOL-
ANT TEMP.

CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: −40�C (−40�F)

OK Replace engine coolant temperature sensor.

NG
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5 Check for short in harness or engine control ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(c) When using hand−held tester, enter the following menus:

DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / COOL-
ANT TEMP.

CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: −40�C (−40�F)

OK Repair or replace harness or connector.

NG

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI−74).


